Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In the course of  preparing the Oregon Business Development Department’s
budget for the 2027-2029 biennium, the Director of the Oregon Business  Development De-
partment or the director’s designees shall:
(1) Evaluate  the effectiveness of the programs administered by the department based on
the number of applications, actual use and anticipated need;
(2) Identify application requirements that  the various department programs have in
common, and, to the greatest extent possible, make the  requirements uniform across all
applications required for the programs administered  under all divisions of the department;
and
(3) Make recommendations for:
(a) Consolidating department programs that are similar to or duplicative of each other;
(b) Eliminating department programs that have few or no beneficiaries;
(c) Annexing to  department programs similar programs administered by other state
agencies; and
(d) Separating specific functions  or divisions from the department and rehousing them
in more appropriate state agencies or establishing them as stand-alone bodies.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 11 (1), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, is increased  by $350,000 for expenses related to imple-
mentation of section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4062 (HB 4062-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4062 (HB 4062-A) Page 2